Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.736

[Art. 104] Aiding the enemy.

Any person subject to this code who:

(1) Aids, or attempts to aid, the enemy with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other things; or

(2) Without proper authority, knowingly harbors or protects or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with or holds any intercourse with the enemy, either directly or indirectly;

shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 103.]